Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.210

Compensation boards—Established.

(1) In each local organization for emergency management established by the legislative authority of the county in accordance with the provisions of RCW 38.52.070, there is hereby created and established a compensation board for the processing of claims as provided in this chapter. The compensation board shall be composed of: (a) The county executive if the county has an elected county executive or, if it does not, one member of the county legislative authority selected by the authority. The executive or the member will serve as the chair of the compensation board; (b) the county director of emergency services; (c) the prosecuting attorney; (d) the emergency services coordinator for medical and health services; and (e) the county auditor who will serve as secretary of the compensation board.

(2) In each local organization for emergency management established by cities and towns in accordance with RCW 38.52.070, there is hereby created and established a compensation board for the processing of claims as provided in this chapter. The compensation board shall be composed of the mayor; the city director of emergency management; one councilmember or commissioner selected by the council or the commission; the city attorney or corporation counsel; and the local coordinator of medical and health services. The councilmember or commissioner so selected shall serve as the chair of the compensation board and the city director of emergency management shall serve as secretary of the board.

[ 1986 c 266 s 32; 1984 c 38 s 23; 1981 c 213 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 26; 1953 c 223 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.